Louisiana, session 2026, HB725.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
8 Section 1. R.S. 3:4749.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
9 §4749.4. Retailers; records
10 A. Records of all purchases of seafood by retailers shall be maintained for
11 at least six months from the date the seafood was purchased. The records of
12 purchases shall be available for inspection by the department.
13 B. Failing to maintain records or knowingly creating or submitting false or
14 fraudulent purchase records shall constitute a violation of this Section and shall be
15 subject to such civil penalties as the commissioner deems necessary.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.